Missouri, session 2026, HB3496.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 48.010, 49.082, 50.327, 50.333, 50.334, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082,
54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 58.095, and 473.742, RSMo, are repealed and thirteen new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 48.010, 49.082, 50.327, 50.333, 50.334,
51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 58.095, and 473.742, to read as follows:
48.010. 1. For the purposes of this chapter, "assessed valuation" shall mean the
valuation of all real and personal property as determined and finally established by the state
agency charged with the duty of equalizing assessments.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for the purpose of
establishing county classification, the valuation of nonclassed property and abated
property may be included in the total valuation of all real and personal property in the
county.
49.082. 1. A county commissioner in any county, other than in a first classification
chartered county or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and
not containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall,
subject to any other adjustment otherwise provided in this section, receive an annual salary
computed as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be the
amount thereof as shown for the year next preceding the computation. The provisions of this
section shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for
the office of commissioner on January 1, 1997.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3496 2
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $19,140
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 19,800
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 21,120
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 22,440
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 23,760
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 25,080
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 26,400
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 27,060
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 27,390
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 28,380
300,000,000 or more 29,700
2. A county commissioner who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive
an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $23,800
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $25,800
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $27,800
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $29,800
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $31,700
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $33,700
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $35,700
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $37,700
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $39,700
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $41,600
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $43,600
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $45,600
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $47,600
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $49,600
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $51,500
$10,000,000,001 or more $53,500
3. In addition to any compensation provided pursuant to subsection 1 of this section,
the presiding commissioner of any county not having a charter form of government shall
receive two thousand dollars annual salary.

HCS HB 3496 3
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
a commissioner only if the commissioner has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of the commissioner's office when
approved by a professional association of the county commissioners of Missouri unless
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of
completion to each commissioner who completes the training program and shall send a list of
certified commissioners to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the
training session may be reimbursed to a county commissioner in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
[4.] 5. A county commissioner in any county, other than a first classification charter
county or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and not
containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not,
except upon a two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an annual
compensation in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the office of
county commissioner or presiding commissioner respectively for the particular county for
services rendered or performed on the date the salary commission votes.
50.327. 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the salary
schedules contained in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 51.282, 52.269, 53.082,
53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742 shall be set as a base schedule
for those county officials. Except when it is necessary to increase newly elected or reelected
county officials' salaries, in accordance with Section 13, Article VII, Constitution of
Missouri, to comply with the requirements of this section, the salary commission in all
counties except charter counties in this state shall be responsible for the computation of
salaries of all county officials; provided, however, that any percentage salary adjustments in a
county shall be equal for all such officials in that county and any salary adjustment after
August 28, 2026, shall not decrease the current salary of any official. To the extent that
the salary of any official exceeds the amount set forth in the salary schedules contained
in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091,
56.265, 58.095, and 473.742 on August 28, 2026, such salary shall only be increased as a
result of further increases to assessed value as provided in such sections or in section
50.333.
2. In addition to the amounts set forth in the salary schedules contained in
sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091,
56.265, 58.095, and 473.742, salaries shall be adjusted each year on the anniversary date
of each official's current term. The amount of adjustment shall be based on the
following calculation:

HCS HB 3496 4
(1) Beginning with the difference between the last completed assessed value for
the county minus the assessed value for the county for the year prior to the last
completed assessed value;
(2) Dividing the difference by the amount of the last completed assessed value to
determine the annual assessed value growth;
(3) Multiplying the annual assessed value growth according to the chart below;
Annual Assessed Value Growth Amount
Negative No change
0-2.99% 1
3.00-5.99% 0.5
6.00-6.99% 0.33
7.00-7.99% 0.25
8.00-9.99% 0.20
10% or more 0.13
(4) Multiplying the product of the calculation in subdivision (3) of this subsection
by the official's current salary; and
(5) Adding the product of the calculation set forth in subdivision (4) of this
subsection to the current salary amount.

Adjustments made under this subsection shall not equal or exceed the salary for the next
highest assessed valuation contained in sections 49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 52.269,
53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091, 56.265, 58.095, and 473.742.
3. Upon majority approval of the salary commission, the annual compensation of
part-time prosecutors contained in section 56.265 and the county offices contained in sections
49.082, 50.334, 50.343, 51.281, 51.282, 52.269, 53.082, 53.083, 54.261, 54.320, 55.091,
58.095, and 473.742 may be increased [by up to two thousand dollars] greater than the
compensation provided by the salary schedules; provided, however, that any vote to increase
compensation be effective for all county offices in that county subject to the salary
commission.
[3.] 4. Upon the majority approval of the salary commission, the annual compensation
of a county coroner of any county not having a charter form of government as provided in

HCS HB 3496 5
section 58.095 may be increased up to fourteen thousand dollars greater than the
compensation provided by the salary schedule of such section.
[4.] 5. The salary commission of any county of the third classification may amend the
base schedules for the computation of salaries for county officials referenced in subsection 1
of this section to include assessed valuation factors in excess of three hundred million dollars;
provided that the percentage of any adjustments in assessed valuation factors shall be equal
for all such officials in that county.
50.333. 1. There shall be a salary commission in every nonchartered county.
2. The clerk or court administrator of the circuit court of the judicial circuit in which
such county is located shall set a date, time and place for the salary commission meeting and
serve as temporary [chairman] chair of the salary commission until the members of the
commission elect a [chairman] chair from their number. Upon written request of a majority
of the salary commission members the clerk or court administrator of the circuit court shall
forthwith set the earliest date possible for a meeting of the salary commission. The circuit
clerk or court administrator shall give notice of the time and place of any meeting of the
salary commission. Such notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in
such county at least five days prior to such meeting. Such notice shall contain a general
description of the business to be discussed at such meeting.
3. The members of the salary commission shall be:
(1) The recorder of deeds if the recorder's office is separate from that of the circuit
clerk;
(2) The county clerk;
(3) [The prosecuting attorney;
(4) The sheriff;
(5)] The county commissioners;
[(6)] (4) The collector or treasurer ex officio collector;
[(7)] (5) The treasurer or treasurer ex officio collector;
[(8)] (6) The assessor;
[(9)] (7) The auditor;
[(10)] (8) The public administrator; and
[(11)] (9) The coroner.

In a county with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants, the prosecuting attorney and the sheriff shall be members of the
salary commission. In any county that utilizes assistant prosecuting attorneys, such
assistant prosecuting attorneys shall be members of the salary commission.

HCS HB 3496 6
4. Members of the salary commission shall receive no additional compensation for
their services as members of the salary commission. A majority of members shall constitute a
quorum.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 610.021 and 610.022, all meetings
of a county salary commission shall be open meetings and all votes taken at such meetings
shall be open records. Any vote taken at any meeting of the salary commission shall be taken
by recorded yeas and nays.
[5.] 6. In every county, the salary commission shall meet at least once before
November thirtieth of each odd-numbered year and may meet in any even-numbered year.
The salary commission may meet as many times as it deems necessary and may meet after
November thirtieth and prior to December fifteenth of any odd-numbered year if the
commission has met at least once prior to November thirtieth of that year. At any meeting of
the salary commission, the members shall elect a [chairman] chair from their number. The
county clerk shall present a report on the financial condition of the county to the commission
once the [chairman] chair is elected, and shall keep the minutes of the meeting.
[6.] 7. For purposes of this section, the 1988 base compensation is the compensation
paid on September 1, 1987, plus the same percentage increase paid or allowed, whichever is
greater, to the presiding commissioner or the sheriff, whichever is greater, of that county for
the year beginning January 1, 1988. Such increase shall be expressed as a percentage of the
difference between the maximum allowable compensation and the compensation paid on
September 1, 1987. [At its meeting in 1987 and at any meeting held in 1988, the salary
commission shall determine the compensation to be paid to every county officer holding
office on January 1, 1988.] The salary commission shall establish the compensation for each
office at an amount not greater than that set by law as the maximum compensation. If the
salary commission votes to increase compensation, but not to pay the maximum amount
authorized by law for any officer or office, then the increase in compensation shall be the
same percentage increase for all officers and offices and shall be expressed as a percentage of
the difference between the maximum allowable compensation and the compensation being
received at the time of the vote. If two-thirds of the members of the salary commission vote
to decrease the compensation being received at the time of the vote below that compensation,
all officers shall receive the same percentage decrease. The commission may vote not to
increase or decrease the compensation and that compensation shall continue to be the salary
of such offices and officers during the subsequent term of office.
[7.] 8. For the year 1989 and every second year thereafter, the salary commission
shall meet in every county as many times as it deems necessary on or prior to November
thirtieth of any such year for the purpose of determining the amount of compensation to be
paid to county officials. For each year in which the commission meets, the members shall

HCS HB 3496 7
elect a [chairman] chair from their number. The county clerk shall present a report on the
financial condition of the county to the commission once the [chairman] chair is elected, and
shall keep minutes of the meeting. The salary commission shall then consider the
compensation to be paid for the next term of office for each county officer to be elected at
their next general election. If the commission votes not to increase or decrease the
compensation, the salary being paid during the term in which the vote was taken shall
continue as the salary of such offices and officers during the subsequent term of office. If the
salary commission votes to increase the compensation, all officers or offices whose
compensation is being considered by the commission at that time shall receive the same
percentage of the maximum allowable compensation. However, for any county in which all
offices' and officers' salaries have been set at one hundred percent of the maximum allowable
compensation, the commission may vote to increase the compensation of all offices except
that of full-time prosecuting attorneys at that or any subsequent meeting of the salary
commission without regard to any law or maximum limitation established by law. Such
increase shall be expressed as a percentage of the compensation being paid during the term of
office when the vote is taken, and each officer or office whose compensation is being
established by the salary commission at that time shall receive the same percentage increase
over the compensation being paid for that office during the term when the vote is taken. This
increase shall be in addition to any increase mandated by an official's salary schedule because
of changes in assessed valuation during the current term. If the salary commission votes to
decrease the compensation, a vote of two-thirds or more of all the members of the salary
commission shall be required before the salary or other compensation of any county office
shall be decreased below the compensation being paid for the particular office on the date the
salary commission votes, and all officers and offices shall receive the same percentage
decrease.
[8.] 9. The salary commission shall issue, not later than December fifteenth of any
year in which it meets, a report of compensation to be paid to each officer and the
compensation so set shall be paid beginning with the start of the subsequent term of office of
each officer. The report of compensation shall be certified to the clerk of the county
commission for the county and shall be in substantially the following form:
The salary commission for ______County hereby certifies that it has met pursuant to
law to establish compensation for county officers to be paid to such officers during the next
term of office for the officers affected. The salary commission reports that there shall be (no
100 increase in compensation) (an increase of ______percent) (a decrease of ______percent)
101 (county officer's salaries set at ______percent of the maximum allowable compensation).
102

HCS HB 3496 8
103 Salaries shall be adjusted each year on the official's year of incumbency for any change in the
104 last completed assessment that would affect the maximum allowable compensation for that
105 office.
106 [9.] 10. For the meeting in 1989 and every meeting thereafter, in the event a salary
107 commission in any county fails, neglects or refuses to meet as provided in this section, or in
108 the event a majority of the salary commission is unable to reach an agreement and so reports
109 or fails to certify a salary report to the clerk of the county commission by December fifteenth
110 of any year in which a report is required to be certified by this section, then the compensation
111 being paid to each affected office or officer on such date shall continue to be the
112 compensation paid to the affected office or officer during the succeeding term of office.
113 [10.] 11. Other provisions of law notwithstanding, in every instance where an officer
114 or employee of any county is paid a mileage allowance or reimbursement, the county
115 commission shall allow or reimburse such officers or employees out of the county treasury at
116 the highest rate paid to any county officer for each mile actually and necessarily traveled in
117 the performance of their official duties. The county commission of any county may elect to
118 pay a mileage allowance for any county commissioner for travel going to and returning from
119 the place of holding commission meetings and for all other necessary travel on official county
120 business in the personal motor vehicle of the commissioner presenting the claim. The
121 governing body of any county of the first classification [not having a charter form of
122 government] may provide by order for the payment of mileage expenses of elected and
123 appointed county officials by payment of a certain amount monthly which would reflect the
124 average monthly mileage expenses of such officer based on the amount allowed pursuant to
125 state law for the payment of mileage for state employees. Any order entered for such purpose
126 shall not be construed as salary, wages or other compensation for services rendered.
127 [11.] 12. The term "maximum allowable compensation" as used in this section means
128 the highest compensation which may be paid to the specified officer or office in the particular
129 county based on the salary schedule established by law for the specified officer or office. If
130 the salary commission at its meeting in 1987 voted for one hundred percent of the maximum
131 allowable compensation and does not change such vote at its meeting held within thirty days
132 after May 13, 1988, as provided in subsection 6 of this section, the one hundred percent shall
133 be calculated on the basis of the total allowable compensation permitted after May 13, 1988.
134 [12.] 13. At the salary commission meeting which establishes the percentage rate to
135 be applied to county officers during the next term of office, the salary commission may
136 authorize the further adjustment of such officers' compensation as a cost-of-living component
137 and effective January first of each year, the compensation for county officers may be adjusted
138 by the county commission, and if the adjustment of compensation is authorized, the
139 percentage increase shall be the same for all county officers, not to exceed the percentage

HCS HB 3496 9
140 increase given to the other county employees. The compensation for all county officers may
141 be set as a group, although the change in compensation will not become effective until the
142 next term of office for each officer.
143 [13. At the salary commission meeting in 1997 which establishes the salaries for
144 those officers to be elected at the general election in 1998, the salary commission of each
145 noncharter county may provide salary increases for associate county commissioners elected in
146 1996. This one-time increase is necessitated by the change from two- to four-year terms for
147 associate commissioners pursuant to house bill 256, passed by the first regular session of the
148 eighty-eighth general assembly in 1995.]
50.334. 1. In all counties, except counties of the first classification having a charter
form of government and counties of the first classification not having a charter form of
government and not containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand
or more, each recorder of deeds, if the recorder's office is separate from that of the circuit
clerk, shall receive as total compensation for all services performed by the recorder, except as
provided pursuant to section 50.333, an annual salary which shall be computed on an assessed
valuation basis as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be
the amount thereof as computed for the year next preceding the computation. The county
recorder of deeds whose office is separate from that of the circuit clerk in any county, other
than a county of the first classification having a charter form of government or a county of the
first classification not having a charter form of government and not containing any part of a
city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not, except upon two-thirds
vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an annual compensation in an
amount less than the total compensation being received for the office of county recorder of
deeds in the particular county for services rendered or performed on January 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$ 8,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000

HCS HB 3496 10
2. A recorder of deeds who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
recorder only if he has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each calendar
year relating to the operations of the recorder's office when approved by a professional
association of the county recorders of deeds of Missouri unless [exempted from the training]
an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The professional
association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to each recorder
who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified recorders to the treasurer
of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session shall be reimbursed to
the county recorder in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that
purpose.
51.281. 1. The county clerk in any county, other than in a first classification county,
shall receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule. The assessed
valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year next preceding the
computation. The provisions of this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the
amount of compensation being paid for the office of clerk on January 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000

HCS HB 3496 11
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
2. A county clerk who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
clerk only if the clerk has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each
calendar year relating to the operations of the clerk's office when approved by [a professional]
the Missouri association of [the] county clerks [of Missouri] and election authorities unless
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of

HCS HB 3496 12
completion to each clerk who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified
clerks to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session
may be reimbursed to the county clerk in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[3.] 4. The county clerk may retain any fees to which he is entitled for services
performed in the issuance of fish and game licenses or permits.
[4.] 5. The county clerk in any county, other than a first classification charter county
or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and not containing
any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall not, except upon
two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an annual compensation
in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the office of county clerk in
the particular county for services rendered or performed on the date the salary commission
votes.
52.269. 1. In all counties, except first classification counties having a charter form of
government and first classification counties not having a charter form of government and not
containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, the county
collector shall receive an annual salary which shall be paid in equal monthly installments by
the county. The salary shall be computed on an assessed valuation basis as provided in this
subsection. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount as shown for the year next
preceding the annual salary computation. A county collector subject to the provisions of this
section shall not receive an annual compensation less than the total compensation being
received by the county collector in that county for services rendered or performed for the
period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February 29, 1988. The county collector shall
receive the same percentage adjustments provided by the county salary commissions for
county officers in that county pursuant to section 50.333. The provisions of this section shall
not permit or require a reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the office of
county collector on January 1, 1997, or less than the total compensation being received for the
services rendered or performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February
29, 1988. The salary shall be computed on the basis of the following schedule:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000

HCS HB 3496 13
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
2. A county collector who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
collector only if the collector has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the collector's office when approved by a
professional association of the county collectors of Missouri unless exempted from the
training by the professional association. The professional association approving the program
shall provide a certificate of completion to each collector who completes the training program
and shall send a list of certified collectors to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred
for attending the training session may be reimbursed to the county collector in the same
manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
[3.] 4. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any fee provided for in
section 52.250 or 52.275, when collected on ditch and levee taxes, shall not be collected on

HCS HB 3496 14
behalf of the county and deposited into the county general revenue fund. Such fee shall be
retained by the collector as compensation for his services, in addition to any amount provided
for such collector in this section.
[4.] 5. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, after the next general
election following January 1, 1988, all fees collected by the collector shall be collected on
behalf of the county and deposited in the county general revenue fund.
53.082. 1. The county assessor in any county, other than in a first classification
county, shall receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule
provided in this subsection. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as
shown for the year next preceding the computation. The provisions of this section shall not
permit or require a reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the office of
assessor on September 1, 1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
2. A county assessor who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100

HCS HB 3496 15
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
3. The compensation for county assessors in second, third and fourth classification
counties for the term of office beginning September 1, 1997, shall be calculated pursuant to
the salary schedule in this section using the percentage increase approved by the county salary
commission when establishing the compensation for the office of county assessor at the salary
commission meeting in 1997. This salary shall become effective on September 1, 1997.
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
the assessor only if the assessor has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction
each calendar year relating to the operations of the assessor's office when approved by a
professional association of the county assessors of Missouri unless [exempted from the
training] an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The
professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to
each assessor who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified assessors
to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be
reimbursed to the county assessor in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[4.] 5. The county assessor in any county, except a first classification county, shall
not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an
annual compensation in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the
office of county assessor in the particular county for services rendered or performed on the
date the salary commission votes.
54.261. 1. The county treasurer in counties of the first classification, not having a
charter form of government and containing a portion of a city with a population of three
hundred thousand or more, and in counties of the second, third and fourth classifications of
this state, shall receive as compensation for services performed by the treasurer an annual
salary based upon the assessed valuation of the county. The provisions of this section shall
not permit or require a reduction, nor shall require an increase, in the amount of compensation
being paid for the office of treasurer on January 1, 2002.

HCS HB 3496 16
2. The amount of salary based upon assessed valuation shall be computed according
to the following schedule:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 or more 45,000
3. A county treasurer who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
treasurer only if the treasurer has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction

HCS HB 3496 17
each calendar year relating to the operations of the treasurer's office when approved by a
professional association of the county treasurers or county collectors of Missouri unless
[exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of
completion to each treasurer who completes the training program and shall send a list of
certified treasurers to the county commission of each county. Expenses incurred for attending
the training session shall be reimbursed to the county treasurer in the same manner as other
expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
[4.] 5. The county treasurer in any county, other than a county of the first
classification having a charter form of government or a county of the first classification not
having a charter form of government and not containing any part of a city with a population
of three hundred thousand or more, shall not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members
of the commission, receive an annual compensation in an amount less than the total
compensation being received for the office of county treasurer in the particular county for
services rendered or performed on the date the salary commission votes.
[5.] 6. In the event of a vacancy due to death, resignation, or otherwise in the office of
treasurer in any county except a county with a charter form of government, and when there is
no deputy treasurer, the county commission shall appoint a qualified acting treasurer until
such time as the vacancy is filled by the governor pursuant to section 105.030 or the elected
treasurer returns to work. The county commission shall employ and fix the compensation of
clerical and other assistants necessary to enable the interim treasurer to efficiently perform the
duties of the office.
54.320. 1. The county collector-treasurer in counties of the third and fourth
classifications adopting township organization shall receive an annual salary as set forth in
the following schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown
for the year next preceding the computation. A county collector-treasurer subject to the
provisions of this section shall not receive an annual compensation less than the total
compensation being received by the county treasurer ex officio collector in that county for
services rendered or performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February
29, 1988. The county collector-treasurer shall receive the same percentage adjustments
provided by county salary commissions for county officers in that county pursuant to section
50.333. The provisions of this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of
compensation being paid for the office of county treasurer ex officio collector on January 1,
1997, or less than the total compensation being received for the services rendered or
performed for the period beginning March 1, 1987, and ending February 29, 1988. The salary
shall be computed on the basis of the following schedule:
Assessed Valuation Salary

HCS HB 3496 18
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 30,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 32,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 34,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 36,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 38,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 40,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 41,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 to 449,999,999 45,000

In addition, the collector-treasurer shall collect on behalf of the county a fee for the collection
of all back taxes and all delinquent taxes of two percent on all sums collected to be added to
the face of the tax bill, and collected from the party paying the tax. The collector-treasurer
shall collect on behalf of the county a fee of three percent on all licenses, including current
railroad and utility taxes, surtax, back taxes, delinquent taxes and interest collected by the
collector-treasurer, to be deducted from the amounts collected. The collector-treasurer shall
collect on behalf of the county for the purpose of mailing statements and receipts required by
section 139.350 a fee of one-half of one percent on all licenses and all taxes, including current
taxes, back taxes, delinquent taxes, and interest collected by the collector-treasurer, to be
deducted from the amounts collected. All fees collected under this section shall be collected
on behalf of the county and shall be deposited in the county treasury or as provided by law.
Collector-treasurers in counties having a township form of government are entitled to collect
such fees immediately upon an order of the circuit court under section 139.031. If the protest
is later sustained and a portion of the taxes so paid is returned to the taxpayer the county shall
return that portion of the fee collected on the amount returned to the taxpayer. The collector-
treasurer in each of the third and fourth classification counties which have adopted the
township form of county government is entitled to employ deputies and assistants, and for the
deputies and assistants is allowed not less than the amount allowed in 2003-2004, whichever
is greater.
2. A county collector-treasurer who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall
receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100

HCS HB 3496 19
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
3. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the collector-treasurer in
each county of the third or fourth classification having a township form of government shall
employ not fewer than one full-time deputy. The collector-treasurer may employ such
number of deputies and assistants as may be necessary to perform the duties of the office of
collector-treasurer promptly and correctly, as determined by the collector-treasurer. The
office of the collector-treasurer shall be funded sufficiently to compensate deputies and
assistants at a level no less than the compensation provided for other county employees. Such
deputies and assistants shall be allowed adjustments in compensation at the same percentage
as provided for other county employees, as effective January first each year.
[3.] 4. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
the collector-treasurer only if such officer has completed at least twenty hours of classroom
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of the collector-treasurer's office
when approved by a professional association of the county treasurers or county collectors of
Missouri unless [exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the
professional association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a
certificate of completion to each collector-treasurer who completes the training program and
shall send a list of certified collector-treasurers to the county commission of each county.
Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be reimbursed to the county
collector-treasurer in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that
purpose.
55.091. 1. The county auditor in any county, other than in a first classification
chartered county or a first classification county not having a charter form of government and

HCS HB 3496 20
not containing any part of a city with a population of three hundred thousand or more, shall
receive an annual salary computed on an assessed valuation basis as set forth in the following
schedule. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year
next preceding the computation. The provisions of this section shall not permit or require a
reduction in the amount of compensation being paid for the office of auditor on January 1,
1997.
Assessed Valuation Salary
$131,000,000 to 189,999,999 $40,500
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 41,500
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 43,000
300,000,000 to 399,999,999 45,000
400,000,000 to 499,999,999 46,000
500,000,000 or more 47,000
2. A county auditor who begins a term after August 28, 2026, shall receive an
annual salary computed as set forth in the following schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
3. Two thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to the
auditor only if the auditor has completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each
calendar year relating to the operations of the auditor's office when approved by a

HCS HB 3496 21
professional association of the county auditors of Missouri unless [exempted from the
training] an alternative option is approved by the professional association. The
professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of completion to
each auditor who completes the training program and shall send a list of certified auditors to
the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred attending the training session may be
reimbursed to the county auditor in the same manner as other expenses as may be
appropriated for that purpose.
[3.] 4. The county auditor in any county, other than a first classification charter
county, shall not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission,
receive an annual compensation less than the total compensation being received for the office
of county auditor in the particular county for services rendered or performed on the date the
salary commission votes.
58.095. 1. The county coroner in any county not having a charter form of
government shall receive an annual salary computed on a basis as set forth in the following
schedule, as well as any adjustment authorized under subsection [3] 4 of section 50.327. The
provisions of this section shall not permit or require a reduction in the amount of
compensation being paid for the office of coroner on January 1, 2025:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $8,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 8,500
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 9,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 9,500
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 10,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 11,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 12,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 13,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 14,000
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 15,000
300,000,000 or more 16,000
2. (1) One thousand dollars of the salary authorized in this section shall be payable to
the coroner, deputy coroner, and assistants only if the coroner, deputy coroner, or assistant has
completed at least twenty hours of classroom instruction each calendar year as presented by a
state-recognized and -accredited or nationally recognized and accredited credentialing
organization that certifies individuals to conduct death investigations. Certified training
completion shall be submitted to a professional association of the county coroners of Missouri
which, upon validating the certified training, shall submit the individual's name to the county

HCS HB 3496 22
treasurer and department of health and senior services indicating the individual is compliant
with the training requirements.
(2) Expenses incurred for attending the training session shall be reimbursed to the
county coroner in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose
to the extent that such expenses are not fully reimbursed under paragraph (c) of subdivision
(2) of subsection 1 of section 58.208.
3. The county coroner in any county not having a charter form of government shall
not, except upon two-thirds vote of all the members of the salary commission, receive an
annual compensation in an amount less than the total compensation being received for the
office of county coroner in the particular county for services rendered or performed on the
date the salary commission votes.
4. For the term beginning in 1997, the compensation of the coroner, in counties in
which the salary commission has not voted to pay one hundred percent of the maximum
allowable salary, shall be a percentage of the maximum allowable salary established by this
section. The percentage applied shall be the same percentage of the maximum allowable
salary received or allowed, whichever is greater, to the presiding commissioner or sheriff,
whichever is greater, of that county for the year beginning January 1, 1997. In those counties
in which the salary commission has voted to pay one hundred percent of the maximum
allowable salary, the compensation of the coroner shall be based on the maximum allowable
salary in effect at each time a coroner's term of office commences following the vote to pay
one hundred percent of the maximum allowable compensation. Subsequent compensation
shall be determined as provided in section 50.333.
473.742. 1. Each public administrator in counties of the second, third or fourth
classification and in the City of St. Louis shall make a determination within thirty days after
taking office whether such public administrator shall elect to receive a salary as defined
herein or receive fees as may be allowed by law to executors, administrators and personal
representatives. The election by the public administrator shall be made in writing to the
county clerk. Should the public administrator elect to receive a salary, the public
administrator's office may not then elect to change at any future time to receive fees in lieu of
salary. Every public administrator who begins his or her first term on or after January 1,
2024, shall be deemed to have elected to receive a salary as provided in this section.
2. If a public administrator elects to be placed on salary, the salary shall be based
upon the average number of open letters in the two years preceding the term when the salary
is elected, based upon the following schedule:
(1) Zero to five letters: salary shall be a minimum of seven thousand five hundred
dollars;
(2) Six to fifteen letters: salary shall be a minimum of fifteen thousand dollars;

HCS HB 3496 23
(3) Sixteen to twenty-five letters: salary shall be a minimum of twenty thousand
dollars;
(4) Twenty-six to thirty-nine letters: salary shall be a minimum of twenty-five
thousand dollars;
(5) Public administrators with forty or more letters shall be considered full-time
county officials and shall be paid according to the assessed valuation schedule set forth
below:
Assessed Valuation Salary
$ 8,000,000 to 40,999,999 $29,000
$ 41,000,000 to 53,999,999 $30,000
$ 54,000,000 to 65,999,999 $32,000
$ 66,000,000 to 85,999,999 $34,000
$ 86,000,000 to 99,999,999 $36,000
$ 100,000,000 to 130,999,999 $38,000
$ 131,000,000 to 159,999,999 $40,000
$ 160,000,000 to 189,999,999 $41,000
$ 190,000,000 to 249,999,999 $41,500
$ 250,000,000 to 299,999,999 $43,000
$ 300,000,000 to 449,999,999 $45,000
$ 450,000,000 to 599,999,999 $47,000
$ 600,000,000 to 749,999,999 $49,000
$ 750,000,000 to 899,999,999 $51,000
$ 900,000,000 to 1,049,999,999 $53,000
$ 1,050,000,000 to 1,199,999,999 $55,000
$ 1,200,000,000 to 1,349,999,999 $57,000
$ 1,350,000,000 and over $59,000
(6) A public administrator with forty or more letters who begins a term after
August 28, 2026, shall receive an annual salary computed as set forth in the following
schedule.
Assessed Valuation Salary
Under $51,000,000 $36,100
$51,000,000 to $100,000,000 $39,100
$100,000,001 to $150,000,000 $42,100
$150,000,001 to $200,000,000 $45,100
$200,000,001 to $250,000,000 $48,100

HCS HB 3496 24
$250,000,001 to $300,000,000 $51,100
$300,000,001 to $350,000,000 $54,100
$350,000,001 to $400,000,000 $57,100
$400,000,001 to $450,000,000 $60,100
$450,000,001 to $500,000,000 $63,100
$500,000,001 to $550,000,000 $66,100
$550,000,001 to $600,000,000 $69,100
$600,000,001 to $1,000,000,000 $72,100
$1,000,000,001 to $5,000,000,000 $75,100
$5,000,000,001 to $10,000,000,000 $78,100
$10,000,000,001 or more $81,100
(7) The public administrator in the City of St. Louis shall receive a salary not less
than sixty-five thousand dollars;
[(7)] (8) Two thousand dollars of the compensation authorized in this section shall be
payable to the public administrator only if he or she has completed at least twenty hours of
instruction each calendar year relating to the operations of the public administrator's office
when approved by a professional association of the county public administrators of Missouri
unless [exempted from the training] an alternative option is approved by the professional
association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a certificate of
completion to each public administrator who completes the training program and shall send a
list of certified public administrators to the treasurer of each county. Expenses incurred for
attending the training session shall be reimbursed to the county public administrator in the
same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for that purpose.
3. If a public administrator is appointed by the court as both a guardian and a
conservator to the same ward or protectee, it shall be considered two letters.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 2 or 5 of this section to the contrary, upon majority
approval by the salary commission, a public administrator may be paid according to the
assessed valuation schedule set forth in subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of this section. If the
salary commission elects to pay a public administrator according to the assessed valuation
schedule, the salary commission shall not elect to change at any future time to pay the public
administrator's office according to the average number of open letters in lieu of paying them
according to the assessed valuation schedule.
5. The initial compensation of the public administrator who elects to be put on salary
shall be determined by the average number of letters for the two years preceding the term
when the salary is elected. Salary increases or decreases according to the minimum schedule
set forth in this section shall be adjusted only after the number of open letters places the

HCS HB 3496 25
workload in a different subdivision for two consecutive years. Minimum salary increases or
decreases shall only take effect upon a new term of office of the public administrator. The
number of letters each year shall be determined in accordance with the reporting requirements
set forth in law.
6. All fees collected by a public administrator who elects to be salaried shall be
deposited in the county treasury or with the treasurer for the City of St. Louis.
7. Any public administrator in a county of the first classification without a charter
form of government with a population of less than one hundred thousand inhabitants who
elects to receive fees in lieu of a salary pursuant to this section may elect to join the Missouri
local government employees' retirement system created pursuant to sections 70.600 to 70.755.
8. (1) A letter of guardianship and a letter of conservatorship shall be counted as
separate letters.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, the following terms mean:
100 (a) "Letter of conservatorship", the appointment of a conservatorship of an estate by
101 the court to a protectee adjudged to be disabled;
102 (b) "Letter of guardianship", the appointment of a guardianship by the court to a ward
103 adjudged to be incapacitated.
✔